Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1008.02
Minimum
levy adjustment; calculation; effect.

A minimum
levy adjustment shall be calculated and applied to any local system that has
a general fund common levy for the fiscal year during which aid is certified
that is less than the maximum levy, for such fiscal year for such local system,
allowed pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) or (b) of section 77-3442 without a
vote pursuant to section 77-3444 less five cents for learning communities
and less ten cents for all other local systems. To calculate the minimum levy
adjustment, the department shall subtract the local system general fund common
levy for such fiscal year for such local system from the maximum levy allowed
pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) or (b) of section 77-3442 without a vote pursuant
to section 77-3444 less five cents for learning communities and less ten cents
for all other local systems and multiply the result by the local system's
adjusted valuation divided by one hundred. The minimum levy adjustment shall
be added to the formula resources of the local system for the determination
of equalization aid pursuant to section 79-1008.01. If the minimum levy adjustment
is greater than or equal to the allocated income tax funds calculated pursuant
to section 79-1005.01, the local system
shall not receive allocated income tax funds. If the minimum levy adjustment
is less than the allocated income tax funds calculated pursuant to section
79-1005.01, the local system
shall receive allocated income tax funds in the amount of the difference between
the allocated income tax funds calculated pursuant to section 79-1005.01 and the minimum
levy adjustment. This section does not apply to the calculation of aid for
a local system containing a learning community for the first school fiscal
year for which aid is calculated for such local system.

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 39;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 20;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 21;

Laws 2002, LB 898, § 9;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 85;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 26;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 34;

Laws 2011, LB235, § 13.